Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part  of ORS 675.715 to
675.835.
SECTION 2. (1) The Oregon Board of Licensed Professional Counselors and Therapists
shall establish by rule a schedule of the violations described in ORS 675.745 according to  the
penalties imposed for each type of violation.
(2)(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, the board shall remove from
the website operated by or on behalf of the board, and any publicly accessible print and
electronic publications under the board’s control, all  information related to the discipline of
a licensee or associate as follows:
(A) Three years after the date  on which the licensee or associate satisfied the board’s
order, if the discipline  imposed did not include license suspension or revocation and the vio-
lation is scheduled as a lesser or similar violation, as determined by the board; and
(B) Five years after the date on which the licensee or associate  satisfied the board’s or-
der, if the discipline imposed included license suspension and  the violation is scheduled as a
greater or similar violation, as determined by the board.
(b) The board may not remove the information described in paragraph (a) of this sub-
section from a searchable electronic  database that is publicly accessible and designed to en-
able verification of licensure or registration.
(c) The board may not remove from the website or publications described  in this sub-
section information related to the discipline of a  licensee or associate if the discipline in-
cluded permanent denial of a license.
Enrolled House Bill 2016 (HB 2016-A) Page 1
Passed by House April 17, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 12, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2016 (HB 2016-A) Page 2